Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2054
Physician assistants; licensed; not engaged in unauthorized practice of medicine.

Any physician assistant who is licensed and who renders services under the supervision of a licensed physician as provided by the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act shall not be construed to be engaged in the unauthorized practice of medicine.

Laws 1973, LB 101, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 85-179.18;

Laws 1985, LB 132, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.29;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 712;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 15.